tr: Bant uygulama alanı: Pala; Dip topuz; Sap/Kavrama; Çok amaçlı; Gövde; Tekmelik; Diğer
fi: Teipin käyttöalue: Lapa; Tuppi; Kahva/grippi; Monikäyttöinen; Varsi; Säärisuoja; Muu
en: Tape application area: Blade; Butt-end knob; Handle/Grip; Multi-purpose; Shaft; Shin guard; Other
hr-HR: Područje primjene trake: Oštrica; Završetak drške; Drška/hvatište; Višenamjensko; Štap; Štitnik za potkoljenicu; Ostalo
el: Περιοχή εφαρμογής ταινίας: Λεπίδα; Άκρο λαβής; Λαβή; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Στέλεχος; Επικαλαμίδα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 膠帶應用區域: 桿刃; 握把末端圓頭; 握把; 多用途; 桿身; 護脛; 其他
hu: Szalag alkalmazási területe: Toll; Nyélvég markolat; Nyél / markolat; Többcélú; Szár; Sípcsontvédő; Egyéb
pl: Obszar zastosowania taśmy: Łopatka; Gałka na końcu trzonka; Rączka / chwyt; Wielofunkcyjne; Trzonek; Nagolennik; Inne
pt-BR: Região de aplicação da fita: Lâmina; Ponta superior do cabo; Cabo/grip; Multiuso; Haste; Caneleira; Outro
bg-BG: Област на приложение на лентата: Перо; Накрайник на дръжката; Дръжка/Грип; Многофункционална; Шафт; Кора за пищял; Друго
lt-LT: Juostos taikymo sritis: Mentė; Koto galas; Rankena / kotas; Daugiafunkcė; Kotas; Blauzdos apsauga; Kita
sk-SK: Oblasť použitia pásky: Čepeľ; Koniec rukoväte (knob); Rukoväť/úchop; Viacúčelové použitie; Žrď; Chránič holene; Iné
ro-RO: Zonă de aplicare a benzii: Pală; Mâner superior; Mâner/Prindere; Multifuncțional; Tijă; Apărătoare pentru tibie; Altele
sv: Appliceringsområde för tejp: Blad; Knopp; Handtag/grepp; Flerfunktionell; Skaft; Benskydd; Annat
nb: Bruksområde for teip: Blad; Endeknott; Håndtak/grep; Flerbruk; Skaft; Leggbeskytter; Annet
cs: Oblast aplikace pásky: Čepel; Koncovka (špunt); Rukojeť / grip; Víceúčelová; Shaft; Chránič holeně; Jiné
vi: Vùng dán băng keo: Lưỡi; Núm chuôi; Tay cầm/Cán; Đa năng; Thân; Ốp bảo vệ ống chân; Khác
it: Area di applicazione del nastro: Lama; Pomello inferiore; Manico/Impugnatura; Multiuso; Asta; Parastinchi; Altro
ru: Область применения ленты: Крюк; Набалдашник; Рукоятка/хват; Универсальное; Шафт; Щиток на голень; Другое
fr: Zone d'application du ruban: Lame; Bout du manche; Poignée/prise; Multi-usage; Manche; Protège-tibia; Autre
es: Área de aplicación de la cinta: Hoja; Pomo; Mango/agarre; Multiuso; Eje; Espinillera; Otra
ko: 테이프 부착 부위: 블레이드; 버트엔드 놉; 핸들/그립; 다용도; 샤프트; 정강이 보호대; 기타
th: บริเวณที่ติดเทป: ส่วนใบ; ปุ่มปลายด้าม; ด้ามจับ; อเนกประสงค์; ก้านไม้; สนับแข้ง; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Área de aplicação da fita: Pá; Pega/topo; Cabo/pega; Multiusos; Haste; Caneleira; Outro
de: Anwendungsbereich des Tapes: Kelle; Schaftende (Knauf); Griff/Grip; Mehrzweck; Schaft; Schienbeinschoner; Sonstige
nl: Toepassingsgebied tape: Blad; Knop aan uiteinde; Handgreep/grip; Multifunctioneel; Steel; Scheenbeschermer; Overig
sl-SI: Področje uporabe traku: Lopatica; Konec ročaja; Ročaj/oprijem; Večnamensko; Palica; Ščitnik za golen; Drugo
da: Påføringsområde for tape: Blad; Endeknop; Håndtag/greb; Universel; Skaft; Benskinner; Andet
ja: テープ適用エリア: ブレード; バットエンドノブ; ハンドル/グリップ; 多目的; シャフト; シンガード; その他
zh-CN: 绑带适用区域: 拍面; 握把尾部; 握把; 多用途; 拍杆; 护腿板; 其他